Arkansas, session 2025, SB13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Civil action for
certain victims of child sexual abuse.
(a) Notwithstanding any other statute of limitation or any other law
that may be construed to reduce the statutory period stated in this section,
a claim for injury caused by child sexual abuse may be commenced or
maintained by or on behalf of an injured individual at any time if:
(1) The injured individual was under eighteen (18) years of age
at the time the right to bring a claim for injury accrued;
(2) The injury on which the claim is based arises from the
violation of a criminal sex offense that existed at the time the injury
occurred, regardless of whether a criminal complaint was filed, a criminal
*JLL046*
12/17/2024 1:17:10 PM JLL046

SB13
conviction was obtained, or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere was entered;
(3) A civil action based on the conduct that is the subject of
the claim for injury is barred by the expiration of the statute of
limitations prescribed under § 16-56-116;
(4) The claim for injury is the basis for making or maintaining
a timely claim in a bankruptcy proceeding that was initiated by a
congressionally chartered organization on February 18, 2020; and
(5) The claim for injury is against an entity that is seeking or
has been provided protection under a plan of reorganization in the bankruptcy
proceeding described in subdivision (a)(4) of this section and not against
any other person or entity.
(b) This section applies retroactively to all claims based on
violations of criminal sex offenses that occurred before the effective date
of this act, regardless of the statute of limitation in effect at the time
the violation of the criminal sex offense occurred.
(c) This section does not limit, supersede, or otherwise affect any
other law concerning the statute of limitation for actions for injury caused
by child sexual abuse.
(d) This section expires on December 31, 2026.

















12/17/2024 1:17:10 PM JLL046